Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-802
Institute; Board of Regents; operate; regulate.

The institute shall operate in accordance with the policies and regulations of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1972, LB 1374, § 2.